Maryland, session 2025, SB0678.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
4–302.6.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Business associate” has the meaning stated in 45 C.F.R. § 160.103.
(3) “Electronic health care transactions” has the meaning stated in §
4–302.3 of this subtitle.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0678*

SENATE BILL 678
(4) “Electronic health network” has the meaning stated in § 4–302.3 of this
subtitle.
(5) “Nursing home” has the meaning stated in § 19–1401 of this article.
(b) (1) If a nursing home contracts with or uses an electronic health network
or electronic medical record vendor, the nursing home may direct the electronic health
network or electronic medical record vendor to release patient medical records or electronic
health care transactions held by the electronic health network or electronic medical record
vendor to a business associate of the nursing home.
(2) An electronic health network or electronic medical record vendor
releasing patient medical records or electronic health care transactions under paragraph
(1) of this subsection:
(i) Shall release the patient medical records or electronic health
care transactions in an electronic format that conforms to the specifications of the Office of
the National Coordinator for Health Information Technology or another form required by
the State–designated health information exchange;
(ii) Shall make the patient medical records or electronic health care
transactions available on a regular basis and release the information in a timely manner
to support patient care and monitoring; and
(iii) May not restrict, limit, or charge a fee for the release of the
patient medical records or electronic health care transactions.
(C) THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ENFORCE THIS
SECTION.
(D) (1) ANY PERSON, INCLUDING A PERSON IDENTIFIED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION, MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR DAMAGES,
INJUNCTIVE RELIEF, OR BOTH AND FOR ATTORNEY’S FEES AGAINST ANY PERSON IN
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(2) A PERSON MAY BRING AN ACTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
WHETHER THE PERSON INTERACTED DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY WITH THE PERSON
IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.